Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202181-8,299
State Claims Board; powers; duties.

The State Claims Board shall, for the purposes contemplated by the State Contract Claims Act, the State Miscellaneous Claims Act, the In the Line of Duty Compensation Act, and sections 25-1802 to 25-1807 and 66-1531, have the right, power, and duty to (1) administer oaths, (2) compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, and documents and issue subpoenas for such purposes, and (3) punish the disobedience of such a subpoena or subpoenas, the refusal of a witness to be sworn or testify, or the failure to produce books, papers, and documents, as required by such subpoena or subpoenas so issued, as contempt, in the same manner as are officers who are authorized to take depositions.

Laws 1943, c. 129, § 4, p. 433;

R.S.1943, § 81-860;

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 30, p. 2853;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-8,238;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 49;

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 37;

Laws 2021, LB255, § 7.

State Contract Claims Act, see section 81-8,302.